Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-273
Hearing; by whom attended; witnesses; student excluded; when.

Any hearing conducted pursuant to the Student Discipline Act shall be attended by the hearing examiner, the student, the student's parent or guardian, the student's representative, if any, and counsel for the school board or board of education, if the hearing examiner or the superintendent deems it advisable. Witnesses shall be present only when they are giving information at the hearing. The student may be excluded in the discretion of the hearing examiner at times when the student's psychological evaluation or emotional problems are being discussed. The student's representative may be an attorney. The hearing examiner may exclude anyone from the hearing when his or her actions substantially disrupt an orderly hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 17;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,186;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 77.